Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5057.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4g. (1) Not later than 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the director shall convene a meeting with the commission for the purpose of recommending modifications and limitations to the code that would allow for a triplex, quadplex, 5-plex, or 6-plex in residential structures. The recommendations must include considerations for adequate and available water supply, the presence and response time of a professional fire department, and any other provisions necessary to ensure public health, safety, and general welfare. (2) Not later than 90 days after the director convenes the meeting described under subsection (1), the commission shall provide its recommendations to the director in time for the director to adopt or amend rules or codes as necessary for implementation in the code. If necessary, the director shall add, amend, or rescind rules or the code not later than January 1, 2027.